test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-36saergj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - särgʼ: # Noun (36) särgʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Nom: särgʼ
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Gen: säre
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Par: särge
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Ill: särge
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Ine: [sären, säreh, särehn]
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Ela: särest
    särgʼ+N+Sg+All: särele
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Ade: särel
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Abl: särelt
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Tra: säres
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Ter: säreniq
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Abe: säreldäq
    särgʼ+N+Sg+Com: säregaq
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Nom: säreq
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Gen: särgi
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Par: särgi
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [särgihe, särgi, särgide]
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Ine: [särin, särih, särihn]
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Ela: särist
    särgʼ+N+Pl+All: särile
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Ade: säril
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Abl: särilt
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Tra: säris
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Ter: säriniq
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Abe: särildäq
    särgʼ+N+Pl+Com: särgigaq
